District of Columbia statutes.
47-895.35

Application of Special Assessment.

The Chief Financial Officer shall deposit the Special Assessment revenues collected under this subchapter in the Special Energy Assessment Fund.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 401(b), 57 DCR 3406

History